Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-529.06
Flood control projects; removal to another site; hearing; entry of order.

Upon the hearing held pursuant to section 17-529.05, if the county board finds that the statements set forth in the petition are true and that it is in the best interests of the old city or village to authorize such removal, the county board shall enter an order granting such petition.

Laws 1947, c. 44, § 4, p. 161;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 153.